North Dakota, session 69, SB2064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 19-03.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
19-03.1-05. Schedule I.
1. The controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule I.
2. Schedule I consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or
usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.
3. Opiates. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following
opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers,
whenever the existence of those isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the
specific chemical designation:
a. Acetylmethadol.
b. Allylprodine.
c. Alphacetylmethadol.
d. Alphameprodine.
e. Alphamethadol.
f. Benzethidine.
g. Betacetylmethadol.
h. Betameprodine.
i. Betamethadol.
j. Betaprodine.
k. Brorphine.
l. Clonitazene.
m. Dextromoramide.
n. Diampromide.
o. Diethylthiambutene.
p. Difenoxin.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 2
q. Dimenoxadol.
r. Dimepheptanol.
s. Dimethylthiambutene.
t. Dioxaphetyl butyrate.
u. Dipipanone.
v. Ethylmethylthiambutene.
w. Etonitazene.
x. Etoxeridine.
y. Furethidine.
z. Hydroxypethidine.
aa. Isotonitazene (also known as N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4- isopropoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-
benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine).
bb. Ketobemidone.
cc. Levomoramide.
dd. Levophenacylmorphan.
ee. Morpheridine.
ff. MPPP (also known as 1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine).
gg. Noracymethadol.
hh. Norlevorphanol.
ii. Normethadone.
jj. Norpipanone.
kk. PEPAP (1-(2-Phenylethyl)-4-Phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine).
ll. Phenadoxone.
mm. Phenampromide.
nn. Phenomorphan.
oo. Phenoperidine.
pp. Piritramide.
qq. Proheptazine.
rr. Properidine.
ss. Propiram.
tt. Racemoramide.
uu. Tilidine.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 3
vv. Trimeperidine.
ww. 3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide (also known as U-
47700).
xx. 1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine (also know as MT-45).
yy. 3,4-dichloro-N-{[1-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]methyl}benzamide (also known as AH-
7921).
zz. Zipeprol.
aaa. 2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine (also
known as Butonitazene).
bbb. 2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine (also known as
Etodesnitazene and etazene).
ccc. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-fluorobenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (also
known as Flunitazene).
ddd. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (also known as
Metodesnitazene).
eee. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (also
known as Metonitazene).
fff. 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole (also known as
N-Pyrrolidino Etonitazene and Etonitazepyne).
ggg. N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4-propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (also
known as Protonitazene).
hhh. N-ethyl-2-(2-(4-isopropoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (Other
name: N-desethyl isotonitazene).
iii. 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2-(piperidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole (Other names: N-
piperidinyl etonitazene; etonitazepipne).
jjj. 2-Methyl AP-237 (1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1-yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one).
kkk. Fentanyl derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule or
are not FDA approved drugs, and are derived from N-(1-(2-Phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-
phenylpropanamide (Fentanyl) by any substitution on or replacement of the phenethyl
group, any substitution on the piperidine ring, any substitution on or replacement of the
propanamide group, any substitution on the anilido phenyl group, or any combination of
the above. Examples include:
(1) N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide (also known as
Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl).
(2) N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl]propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-
phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido)piperidine (also known as Alpha-methylfentanyl).
(3) N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as
Alpha-methylthiofentanyl).
(4) N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as
Beta-hydroxyfentanyl).

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 4
(5) N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also
known as Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl).
(6) N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as 3-
Methylfentanyl).
(7) N-[3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as
3-Methylthiofentanyl).
(8) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]propanamide (also known as
Para-fluorofentanyl).
(9) N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]propanamide (also known as
Thiofentanyl).
(10) N-(1-phenylethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide (also known as
Furanyl Fentanyl).
(11) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide; N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylbutanamide (also known as Butyryl Fentanyl).
(12) N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethyl]piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide; N-[1-
[2-hydroxy-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl]-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as
Beta-Hydroxythiofentanyl).
(13) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (also known as Acetyl Fentanyl).
(14) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide (also known as Acryl Fentanyl).
(15) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide (also known as Valeryl
Fentanyl).
(16) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide (also known as 4-
Fluoroisobutyryl Fentanyl).
(17) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide (also known as Ortho-
fluorofentanyl, 2-Fluorofentanyl).
(18) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide (also known
as Tetrahydrofuranyl Fentanyl).
(19) 2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (also known as
Methoxyacetyl Fentanyl).
(20) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide (also known as
Cyclopropyl Fentanyl).
(21) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide (also known
as Ocfentanil).
(22) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide (also known as
Cyclopentyl Fentanyl).
(23) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide (also known as Isobutyryl
Fentanyl).
(24) N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide (also known as Para-
chloroisobutyryl Fentanyl).

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 5
(25) N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide (also known as Para-
methoxybutyryl Fentanyl).
(26) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide (also known as Para-
fluorobutyryl Fentanyl).
(27) N-(1-(2-fluorophenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-(2-fluorophenyl)propionamide (also known
as 2'-fluoro Ortho-fluorofentanyl; 2'-fluoro 2-fluorofentanyl).
(28) N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide (also known as Ortho-
methyl Acetylfentanyl; 2-methyl acetylfentanyl).
(29) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N,3-diphenylpropanamide (also known as Beta'-
phenyl Fentanyl; 3-phenylpropanoyl fentanyl and Hydrocinnamoyl Fentanyl).
(30) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylthiophene-2-carboxamide (also known as
Thiofuranyl Fentanyl; 2-thiofuranyl fentanyl; thiophene fentanyl).
(31) (E)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbut-2-enamide (also known as Crotonyl
Fentanyl).
(32) N-(1-(4-methylphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (4'-methyl acetyl
fentanyl).
(33) N-phenyl-N-(1-(2-phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)propionamide (beta-methyl fentanyl).
(34) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide (ortho-fluorobutyryl
fentanyl; 2-fluorobutyryl fentanyl).
(35) 2-methoxy-N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide (ortho-
methyl methoxyacetylfentanyl; 2-methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl).
(36) N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide (para-
methylfentanyl; 4-methylfentanyl).
(37) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbenzamide (phenyl fentanyl; benzoyl
fentanyl).
(38) Ethyl (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)(phenyl)carbamate (fentanyl carbamate).
(39) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acrylamide (ortho-fluoroacryl
fentanyl).
(40) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide (ortho-
fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl).
(41) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide (para-fluoro
furanyl fentanyl).
(42) 2',5'-dimethoxyfentanyl(N-(1-(2,5-dimethoxyphenethyl)piperidine-4-yl)-N-
phenylpropionamide).
(43) 3-furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-3-carboxamide).
(44) alpha'-methyl butyryl fentanyl(2-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylbutanamide).
(45) beta-methylacetyl fentanyl(N-phenyl-N-(1-(2-phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)acetamide).
(46) isovaleryl fentanyl(3-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide).

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 6
(47) meta-fluorofentanyl(N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide).
(48) meta-fluorofuranyl fentanyl(N-3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpipieridin-4-yl)furan-2-
carboxamide.
(49) meta-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl(N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
yl)isobutyramide).
(50) ortho-chlorofentanyl(N-(2-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide.
(51) ortho-fluorofuranyl fentanyl(N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-
carboxamide).
(52) ortho-methylcyclopropylfentanyl(N-2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide.
(53) para-chlorofentanyl(N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide).
(54) para-fluoro valeryl fentanyl(N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
yl)pentanamide).
(55) para-methoxyfuranyl fentanyl(N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
yl)furan-2-carboxamide).
(56) para-methylcyclopropyl fentanyl(N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenylpiperidin-4-
yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide).
(57) tetrahydrothiofuranyl fentanyl(N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenyltetrahydrothiophene-2-carboxamide).
4. Opium derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of
the following opium derivatives, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
a. Acetorphine.
b. Acetyldihydrocodeine.
c. Benzylmorphine.
d. Codeine methylbromide.
e. Codeine-N-Oxide.
f. Cyprenorphine.
g. Desomorphine.
h. Dihydromorphine.
i. Drotebanol.
j. Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt).
k. Heroin.
l. Hydromorphinol.
m. Methyldesorphine.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 7
n. Methyldihydromorphine.
o. Morphine methylbromide.
p. Morphine methylsulfonate.
q. Morphine-N-Oxide.
r. Myrophine.
s. Nicocodeine.
t. Nicomorphine.
u. Normorphine.
v. Pholcodine.
w. Thebacon.
5. Hallucinogenic substances. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule,
any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the following
hallucinogenic substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation (for purposes of this subsection only, the term "isomer" includes the optical,
position, and geometric isomers):
a. Alpha-ethyltryptamine, its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (also known as
etryptamine; a-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl) indole).
b. Alpha-methyltryptamine.
c. 4-methoxyamphetamine (also known as 4-methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine;
paramethoxyamphetamine; PMA).
d. N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-
3,4(methylenedioxy)phenylamine, and N-hydroxy MDA.
e. Ibogaine (also known as 7-Ethyl-6, 6B, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12, 13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6, 9-
methano-5 H-pyrido [1', 2':1,2] azepino (5,4-b) indole; Tabernanthe iboga).
f. Lysergic acid diethylamide.
g. Marijuana.
h. Parahexyl (also known as 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7,8,9,10-tetrahydro- 6,6,9-trimethyl-6H-
dibenzol[b,d]pyran; Synhexyl).
i. Peyote (all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii
Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such
plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of
such plant, its seeds, or its extracts).
j. N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate.
k. N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate.
l. Psilocybin.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 8
m. (1) Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a
plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), as well as synthetic equivalents of the
substances contained in the cannabis plant, or in the resinous extractives of such
plant, including synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar
chemical structure and pharmacological activity to those substances contained in
the plant; such as the following:
(a) Delta-1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. Other
names: Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol.
(b) Delta-6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. Other
names: Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol.
(c) Delta-3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers.
(Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds
of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions covered.)
(2) Tetrahydrocannabinols do not include:
(a) The allowable amount of total tetrahydrocannabinol found in hemp or an
allowed hemp commodity or product as defined in chapter 4.1-18.1; or
(b) A prescription drug approved by the United States food and drug
administration under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act
[21 U.S.C. 355].
n. Cannabinoids, synthetic. It includes the chemicals and chemical groups listed below,
including their homologues, salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. The term "isomer"
includes the optical, position, and geometric isomers.
(1) Indole acetamides. Any compound structurally derived from 1H-indole3-acetamide
or 1H-2-acetamide substituted in both of the following ways: at the nitrogen atom of
the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl, tetrahydropyranylmethyl,
benzyl, or halo benzyl group; and, at the hydrogen of the acetamide by a phenyl,
benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, pyrrolidinyl, piperazinyl, or
propionaldehyde group whether or not the compound is further modified to any
extent in the following ways:
(a) Substitution to the indole ring to any extent; or
(b) Substitution to the phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl,
pyrrolidinyl, piperazinyl, or propionaldehyde group to any extent; or
(c) A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the indole ring; or
(d) A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, or
cyclopropyl ring.
(e) Examples include:
[1] N-cyclohexyl-2-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)acetamide - Other names: CH-PIATA,
Cyclohexyl-PIATA, CHX-PIATA, CH-PIACA, and CHX-PIACA.
[2] N-cyclohexyl-2-[1-[(4-fluorophenyl)methyl]indol-3-yl]acetamide - Other
names: CH-FUBIATA and CH-FUBIACA.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 9
[3] 2-[[2-[1-[(4-fluorophenyl)methyl]indol-3-yl]acetyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-
butanamide - Other names: ADB-FUBIATA, FUB-ACADB, and AD-18.
(2) Indole carboxaldehydes. Any compound structurally derived from 1H-indole-3-
carboxaldehyde or 1H-2-carboxaldehyde substituted in both of the following ways:
at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, tetrahydropyranylmethyl, benzyl, or halo benzyl group; and, at
the hydrogen of the carboxaldehyde by a phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl,
adamantyl, cyclopropyl, pyrrolidinyl, piperazinyl, or propionaldehyde group whether
or not the compound is further modified to any extent in the following ways:
(a) Substitution to the indole ring to any extent; or
(b) Substitution to the phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl,
pyrrolidinyl, piperazinyl, or propionaldehyde group to any extent; or
(c) A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the indole ring; or
(d) A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, or
cyclopropyl ring.
(e) Examples include:
[1] 1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: JWH-018 and AM-678.
[2] 1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: JWH-073.
[3] 1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: JWH-081.
[4] 1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: JWH-
200.
[5] 1-Propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: JWH-015.
[6] 1-Hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: JWH-019.
[7] 1-Pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: JWH-122.
[8] 1-Pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: JWH-210.
[9] 1-Pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: JWH-398.
[10] 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole - Other names: AM-2201.
[11] 1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole - Other names:
RCS-8.
[12] 1-Pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole - Other names: JWH-250.
[13] 1-Pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole - Other names: JWH-251.
[14] 1-Pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole - Other names: JWH-203.
[15] 1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole - Other names: RCS-4.
[16] (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole) - Other names: AM-694.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 10
[17] (4-Methoxyphenyl)-[2-methyl-1-(2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl)indol-3-
yl]methanone - Other names: WIN 48,098 and Pravadoline.
[18] (1-Pentylindol-3-yl)-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone -- Other
names: UR-144.
[19] (1-(5-fluoropentyl)indol-3-yl)-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone -
Other names: XLR-11.
[20] (1-(2-morpholin-4-ylethyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone - Other names: A-796,260.
[21] (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazol-3-yl)(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone -- Other
names: THJ-2201.
[22] 1-naphthalenyl(1-pentyl-1H-indazol-3-yl)-methanone -- Other names:
THJ-018.
[23] (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-yl)(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone
- Other names: FUBIMINA.
[24] 1-[(N-methylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl]-3-(adamant-1-oyl) indole - Other
names: AM-1248.
[25] 1-Pentyl-3-(1-adamantoyl)indole - Other names: AB-001 and JWH-018
adamantyl analog.
(3) Indole carboxamides. Any compound structurally derived from 1H-indole-3-
carboxamide or 1H-2-carboxamide substituted in both of the following ways: at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, tetrahydropyranylmethyl, benzyl, or halo benzyl group; and, at
the nitrogen of the carboxamide by a phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl,
cyclopropyl, or propionaldehyde group whether or not the compound is further
modified to any extent in the following ways:
(a) Substitution to the indole ring to any extent; or
(b) Substitution to the phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, or
propionaldehyde group to any extent; or
(c) A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the indole ring; or
(d) A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, or
cyclopropyl ring.
(e) Examples include:
[1] N-Adamantyl-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide - Other names: JWH-
018 adamantyl carboxamide, APICA, SDB-001, and 2NE1.
[2] N-Adamantyl-1-fluoropentylindole-3-carboxamide - Other names: STS-
135.
[3] N-Adamantyl-1-pentyl-1H-Indazole-3-carboxamide - Other names: AKB
48 and APINACA.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 11
[4] N-1-naphthalenyl-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide - Other names:
NNEI and MN-24.
[5] N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide - Other names: ADBICA.
[6] (S)-N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide - Other names: AB-PINACA.
[7] N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropyl]-1-[(4-fluorophenyl)methyl]-
1H-indazole-3-carboxamide - Other names: AB-FUBINACA.
[8] N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide - Other names: 5-Fluoro AB-PINACA and 5F-AB-PINACA.
[9] N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide - Other names: ADB-PINACA.
[10] N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropyl]-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-
indazole-3-carboxamide - Other names: AB-CHMINACA.
[11] N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-
indazole-3-carboxamide - Other names: ADB-FUBINACA.
[12] N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H -indazole-3-carboxamide -
Other names: FUB-AKB48, FUB-APINACA, and AKB48 N-(4-
FLUOROBENZYL).
[13] 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(quinolin-8-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide - Other
names: 5-fluoro-THJ.
[14] methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-
methylbutanoate - Other names: 5-fluoro AMB and 5F-AMB.
[15] methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-
methylbutanoate - Other names: FUB-AMB, MMB-FUBINACA, and
AMB-FUBINACA.
[16] N-[1-(aminocarbonyl)-2,2-dimethylpropyl]-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1
H-indazole-3-carboxamide - Other names: MAB-CHMINACA and
ADB-CHMINACA.
[17] Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
dimethylbutanoate - Other names: 5F-ADB and 5F-MDMB-PINACA.
[18] N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide -
Other names: 5F-APINACA and 5F-AKB48.
[19] Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
dimethylbutanoate - Other names: MDMB-CHMICA and
MMB-CHMINACA.
[20] Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
dimethylbutanoate - Other names: MDMB-FUBINACA.
[21] 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide -
Other names: 4-CN-CUMYL-BUTINACA; 4-cyano- CUMYL-BUTINACA;
4-CN-CUMYL BINACA; CUMYL-4CN -BINACA; SGT-78.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 12
[22] methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-
3-methylbutanoate - Other names: MMB-CHMICA, AMB-CHMICA.
[23] 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-pyrrolo[2,3-b]pyridine-3-
carboxamide - Other names: 5F-CUMYL-P7AICA.
[24] ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
dimethylbutanoate - Other names: 5F-EDMB-PINACA.
[25] methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
dimethylbutanoate - Other names: 5F-MDMB-PICA and 5F- MDMB-
2201.
[26] 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide -
Other names: 5F-CUMYL-PINACA, SGT-25.
[27] (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)
methanone - Other names: FUB-144.
[28] methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobutyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
dimethylbutanoate (4F-MDMB-BINACA, 4F-MDMB-BUTINACA).
[29] Methyl 3,3-dimethyl-2-[(1-pent-4-enylindazole-3-
carbonyl)amino]butanoate - Other names: MDMB-4en-PINACA, MDMB-
PENINACA, and 5-CL-ADB-A.
[30] Methyl 2-[[1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole-3-carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-
butanoate - Other names: 5F-MDMB-PICA and 5F- MDMB-2201.
[31] 1-butyl-N-(1-carbamoyl-2,2-dimethyl-propyl)indazole-3-carboxamide -
Other names: ADB-BINACA and ADB-BUTINACA.
[32][30] 5-bromo-N-(1-carbamoyl-2,2-dimethyl-propyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide - Other names: ADB-5Br-INACA.
[33][31] Methyl 2-[(5-bromo-1H-indazole-3-carbonyl)amino]-3,3-dimethyl-
butanoate - Other names: MDMB-5Br-INACA.
[34][32] 5-bromo-1-butyl-N-(1-carbamoyl-2,2-dimethyl-propyl)indazole-3-
carboxamide - Other names: ADB-5'Br-BINACA and ADB-5'Br-
BUTINACA.
[33] Methyl 3,3-dimethyl-2-(1-(pent-4-en-1-yl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamido)butanoate - Other name: MDMB-4en-PINACA.
[34] Methyl 2-[[1-(4-fluorobutyl)indole-3-carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-
butanoate - Other names: 4F-MDMB-BUTICA; 4F-MDMB-BICA.
[35] N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(pent-4-en-1-yl)-1H-
indazole-3-carboxamide - Other name: ADB-4en-PINACA.
[36] Ethyl 2-[[1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole-3-carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-
butanoate - Other names: 5F-EDMB-PICA; 5F-EDMB-2201.
[37] Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methyl
butanoate - Other name: MMB-FUBICA.
[38] N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-butyl-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide - Other name: ADB-BUTINACA.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 13
(4) Indole carboxylic acids. Any compound structurally derived from 1H-indole-3-
carboxylic acid or 1H-2-carboxylic acid substituted in both of the following ways: at
the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, tetrahydropyranylmethyl, benzyl, or halo benzyl group; and, at
the hydroxyl group of the carboxylic acid by a phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl,
adamantyl, cyclopropyl, or propionaldehyde group whether or not the compound is
further modified to any extent in the following ways:
(a) Substitution to the indole ring to any extent; or
(b) Substitution to the phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl,
propionaldehyde group to any extent; or
(c) A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the indole ring; or
(d) A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, or
cyclopropyl ring.
(e) Examples include:
[1] 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester -
Other names: BB-22 and QUCHIC.
[2] naphthalen-1-yl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate - Other
names: FDU-PB-22.
[3] 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester - Other names:
PB-22 and QUPIC.
[4] 1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester - Other
names: 5-Fluoro PB-22 and 5F-PB-22.
[5] quinolin-8-yl-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate - Other names:
FUB-PB-22.
[6] naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate - Other
names: NM2201 and CBL2201.
(5) Naphthylmethylindoles. Any compound containing a 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-
naphthyl)methane structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring
by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-
methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or (tetrahydropyran-4-
yl)methyl group whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent
and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples include:
(a) 1-Pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane - Other names: JWH-175.
(b) 1-Pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl-(4-methyl-1-naphthyl)methane - Other names: JWH-
184.
(6) Naphthoylpyrroles. Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole structure
with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-
methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or (tetrahydropyran-4- yl)methyl group whether or not
further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 14
naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples include: (5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-pentylpyrrol-3-
yl)-naphthalen-1-ylmethanone - Other names: JWH-307.
(7) Naphthylmethylindenes. Any compound containing a naphthylideneindene structure
with substitution at the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl- 2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2 (4 morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2- pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-
methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or (tetrahydropyran-4- yl)methyl group whether or not
further substituted in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the
naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples include: E-1-[1-(1-Naphthalenylmethylene)-
1H-inden-3-yl]pentane - Other names: JWH-176.
(8) Cyclohexylphenols. Any compound containing a 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol
structure with substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-
methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl group whether or not
substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Examples include:
(a) 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol - Other names:
CP 47,497.
(b) 5-(1,1-dimethyloctyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol - Other names:
Cannabicyclohexanol and CP 47,497 C8 homologue.
(c) 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,2R)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-hydroxypropyl)cyclohexyl]-
phenol - Other names: CP 55,940.
(9) Others specifically named:
(a) (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-
6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol - Other names: HU-210.
(b) (6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-
6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol - Other names: Dexanabinol and
HU-211.
(c) 2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-
benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-napthalenylmethanone - Other names: WIN 55,212-2.
(d) Naphthalen-1-yl-(4-pentyloxynaphthalen-1-yl)methanone - Other names:
CB-13.
(e) N-[(Z)-(1-hexyl-2-oxo-indolin-3-ylidene)amino]benzamide - Other names:
BZO-HEXOXIZID and MDA-19.
(f) N-[(Z)-(2-oxo-1-pentyl-indolin-3-ylidene)amino]benzamide - Other names:
BZO-POXIZID, Pentyl MDA-19, and 5C-MDA-19.
(g) N-[(Z)-[1-(5-fluoropentyl)-2-oxo-indolin-3-ylidene]amino]benzamide - Other
names: 5F-BZO-POXIZID and 5F-MDA-19.
(h) N-[(Z)-(2-oxo-1-pent-4-enyl-indolin-3-ylidene)amino]benzamide - Other
names: BZO-4en-POXIZID and 4en-pentyl MDA-19.
(i) N-[(Z)-[1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-2-oxo-indolin-3-ylidene]amino]benzamide - Other
names: BZO-CHMOXIZID, Cyclohexylmethyl MDA-19 and CHM-MDA-19.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 15
(j) N-(1-carbamoyl-2-methyl-propyl)-2-(5-fluoropentyl)-5-(4-
fluorophenyl)pyrazole-3-carboxamide - Other Names: 5F-AB-PFUPPYCA.
(k) 5-Pentyl-2-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)pyrido[4,3-b]indol-1-one - Other names:
CUMYL-PEGACLONE; SGT-151.
o. Substituted phenethylamines. This includes any compound, unless specifically excepted,
specifically named in this schedule, or listed under a different schedule, structurally
derived from phenylethan-2-amine by substitution on the phenyl ring in any of the
following ways, that is to say, by substitution with a fused methylenedioxy ring, fused
furan ring, or fused tetrahydrofuran ring; by substitution with two alkoxy groups; by
substitution with one alkoxy and either one fused furan, tetrahydrofuran, or
tetrahydropyran ring system; or by substitution with two fused ring systems from any
combination of the furan, tetrahydrofuran, or tetrahydropyran ring systems.
(1) Whether or not the compound is further modified in any of the following ways, that is
to say:
(a) By substitution of phenyl ring by any halo, hydroxyl, alkyl, trifluoromethyl,
alkoxy, or alkylthio groups;
(b) By substitution at the 2-position by any alkyl groups; or
(c) By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl,
hydroxybenzyl, methylenedioxybenzyl, or methoxybenzyl groups.
(2) Examples include:
(a) 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2C-C or 2,5-
Dimethoxy-4-chlorophenethylamine).
(b) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2C-D or 2,5-
Dimethoxy-4-methylphenethylamine).
(c) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2C-E or 2,5-
Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenethylamine).
(d) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2C-H or 2,5-
Dimethoxyphenethylamine).
(e) 2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2C-I or 2,5-
Dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine).
(f) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2C-N or 2,5-
Dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine).
(g) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2C-P or 2,5-
Dimethoxy-4-propylphenethylamine).
(h) 2-[4-(Ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (also known as 2C-T-2 or
2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylthiophenethylamine).
(i) 2-[4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (also known as 2C-T-4
or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-isopropylthiophenethylamine).
(j) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2C-B or 2,5-
Dimethoxy-4-bromophenethylamine).

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 16
(k) 2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-(methylthio)phenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2C-T or 4-
methylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).
(l) 1-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenyl)-propan-2-amine (also known as DOI or 2,5-
Dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine).
(m) 1-(4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-2-aminopropane (also known as DOB or
2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromoamphetamine).
(n) 1-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-phenyl)propan-2-amine (also known as DOC or
2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine).
(o) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine
(also known as 2C-B-NBOMe; 2,5B-NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromo-N-(2-
methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine).
(p) 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2 - methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine
(also known as 2C-I-NBOMe; 2,5I-NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodo-N-(2-
methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine).
(q) N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-2-(3,4,5-trimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as
mescaline-NBOMe or 3,4,5-trimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine).
(r) 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine
(also known as 2C-C-NBOMe; 2,5C-NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloro-N-(2-
methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine).
(s) 2-(7-Bromo-5-methoxy-2,3-dihydro-1-benzofuran-4-yl)ethanamine (also
known as 2CB-5-hemiFLY).
(t) 2-(8-bromo-2,3,6,7-tetrahydrofuro [2,3-f][1]benzofuran-4-yl)ethanamine (also
known as 2C-B-FLY).
(u) 2-(10-Bromo-2,3,4,7,8,9-hexahydropyrano[2,3-g]chromen-5-yl)ethanamine
(also known as 2C-B-butterFLY).
(v) N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-1-(8-bromo-2,3,6,7-tetrahydrobenzo[1,2-b:4,5-b']difuran-
4-yl)-2-aminoethane (also known as 2C-B-FLY-NBOMe).
(w) 1-(4-Bromofuro[2,3-f][1]benzofuran-8-yl)propan-2-amine (also known as
bromo-benzodifuranyl-isopropylamine or bromo-dragonFLY).
(x) N-(2-Hydroxybenzyl)-4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine (also known as
2C-I-NBOH or 2,5I-NBOH).
(y) 5-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran (also known as 5-APB).
(z) 6-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran (also known as 6-APB).
(aa) 5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran (also known as 5-APDB).
(bb) 6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3,-dihydrobenzofuran (also known as 6-APDB).
(cc) 2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine (also known as 2,5-dimethoxy-a-
methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA).
(dd) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (also known as DOET).
(ee) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (also known as 2C-T-7).

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 17
(ff) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine.
(gg) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine (also known as 4-methyl-2,5-
dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; DOM and STP).
(hh) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine (also known as MDA).
(ii) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (also known as MDMA).
(jj) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as N-ethyl-alpha-
methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, MDE, MDEA).
(kk) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine.
(ll) Mescaline (also known as 3,4,5-trimethoxyphenethylamine).
p. Substituted tryptamines. This includes any compound, unless specifically excepted,
specifically named in this schedule, or listed under a different schedule, structurally
derived from 2-(1H-indol-3-yl)ethanamine (i.e., tryptamine) by mono- or di-substitution of
the amine nitrogen with alkyl or alkenyl groups or by inclusion of the amino nitrogen atom
in a cyclic structure whether or not the compound is further substituted at the alpha-
position with an alkyl group or whether or not further substituted on the indole ring to any
extent with any alkyl, alkoxy, halo, hydroxyl, or acetoxy groups. Examples include:
(1) 5-methoxy-N,N-diallyltryptamine (also known as 5-MeO-DALT).
(2) 4-acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (also known as 4-AcO-DMT or O-Acetylpsilocin).
(3) 4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine (also known as 4-HO-MET).
(4) 4-hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (also known as 4-HO-DIPT).
(5) 5-methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine (also known as 5-MeO-MiPT).
(6) 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (also known as 5-MeO-DMT).
(7) Bufotenine (also known as 3-(Beta-Dimethyl-aminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole; 3-(2-
dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-
dimethyltryptamine; mappine).
(8) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (also known as 5-MeO-DiPT).
(9) Diethyltryptamine (also known as N,N-Diethyltryptamine; DET).
(10) Dimethyltryptamine (also known as DMT).
(11) Psilocyn.
q. 1-[3-(trifluoromethylphenyl)]piperazine (also known as TFMPP).
r. 1-[4-(trifluoromethylphenyl)]piperazine.
s. 6,7-dihydro-5H-indeno-(5,6-d)-1,3-dioxol-6-amine (also known as 5,6-Methylenedioxy-2-
aminoindane or MDAI).
t. 2-(Ethylamino)-2-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanone (also known as Methoxetamine or
MXE).
u. Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine (also known as N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, (1-
phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE).

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 18
v. Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine (also known as 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine,
PCPy, PHP).
w. Thiophene analog of phencyclidine (also known as (1-[1-(2-thienyl) cyclohexyl]
piperidine; 2-Thienylanalog of phencyclidine; TPCP, TCP).
x. 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine (also known as TCPy).
y. Salvia divinorum, salvinorin A, or any of the active ingredients of salvia divinorum.
6. Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material
compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances
having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, whenever the existence of such
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
a. Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid.
b. Mecloqualone.
c. Methaqualone.
d. Clonazolam (also known as Clonitrazolam).
e. Etizolam.
f. Flualprazolam.
g. Flubromazepam.
h. Flubromazolam.
i. Adinazolam.
j. Bromazolam.
k. Deschloroetizolam.
l. Diclazepam.
7. Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material,
compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances
having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts
of isomers:
a. Aminorex (also known as 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline, or 4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-
oxazolamine).
b. Cathinone.
c. Substituted cathinones. Any compound, material, mixture, preparation, or other product,
unless listed in another schedule or an approved food and drug administration drug (e.g.,
buproprion, pyrovalerone), structurally derived from 2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution
at the 1-position with either phenyl, naphthyl, or thiophene ring systems, whether or not
the compound is further modified in any of the following ways:
(1) By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy, alkoxy,
haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in the
ring system by one or more other univalent substitutents;
(2) By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent;

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 19
(3) By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or
methoxybenzyl groups; or
(4) By inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure.
Some trade or other names:
(a) 3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (also known as MDPPP).
(b) 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone (also known as Ethylone, MDEC, or bk-
MDEA).
(c) 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-methylcathinone (also known as Methylone or bk-
MDMA).
(d) 3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (also known as MDPV).
(e) 3,4-Dimethylmethcathinone (also known as 3,4-DMMC).
(f) 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpentan-1-one (also known as Pentedrone).
(g) 2-Fluoromethcathinone (also known as 2-FMC).
(h) 3-Fluoromethcathinone (also known as 3-FMC).
(i) 4-Methylethcathinone (also known as 4-MEC and 4-methyl-N-ethylcathinone).
(j) 4-Fluoromethcathinone (also known as Flephedrone and 4-FMC).
(k) 4-Methoxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (also known as MOPPP).
(l) 4-Methoxymethcathinone (also known as Methedrone; bk-PMMA).
(m) 4'-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone (also known as MPBP).
(n) Alpha-methylamino-butyrophenone (also known as Buphedrone or MABP).
(o) Alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone (also known as alpha-PBP).
(p) Alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (also known as alpha-PPP).
(q) Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone (also known as Alpha-
pyrrolidinovalerophenone or alpha-PVP).
(r) Beta-keto-N-methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine (also known as Butylone or bk-
MBDB).
(s) Ethcathinone (also known as N-Ethylcathinone).
(t) 4-Methylmethcathinone (also known as Mephedrone or 4-MMC).
(u) Methcathinone.
(v) N,N-dimethylcathinone (also known as metamfepramone).
(w) Naphthylpyrovalerone (naphyrone).
(x) B-Keto-Methylbenzodioxolylpentanamine (also known as Pentylone).
(y) 4-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (also known as 4-MePPP and
MPPP).

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 20
(z) 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)-pentan-1-one (also known as
Ephylone and N-Ethylpentylone).
(aa) N-ethylhexedrone (also known as alpha - ethylaminohexanophenone and 2-
(ethylamino)-1-phenylhexan-1-one)).
(bb) Alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone (also known as alpha-PHP, alpha-
pyrrolidinohexiophenone, and 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one)).
(cc) 4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone (also known as 4-MEAP and 2-
(ethylamino)-1-(4-methylphenyl)pentan-1-one)).
(dd) 4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone (also known as MPHP, 4'-methyl-
alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone and 1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-
yl)hexan-1-one)).
(ee) Alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone (also known as PV8 and 1-phenyl-2-
(pyrrolidin-1-yl)heptan-1-one)).
(ff) 4-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone (also known as 4-chloro-alpha-PVP,
4'-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone, and 1-(4-chlorophenyl)-2-
(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one)).
(gg) 4-methyl-1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one (other name: alpha-PiHP).
(hh) 2-(methylamino)-1-(3-methylphenyl)propan-1-one (other names: 3-MMC; 3-
methylmethcathinone).
(ii) Eutylone (also known as 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2- (ethylamino)butan-1-
one).
d. Fenethylline.
e. Fluoroamphetamine.
f. Fluoromethamphetamine.
g. (±)cis-4-methylaminorex (also known as (±)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-
oxazolamine).
h. N-Benzylpiperazine (also known as BZP, 1-benzylpiperazine).
i. N-ethylamphetamine.
j. N, N-dimethylamphetamine (also known as N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine;
N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine).
k. 1-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-methylpropan-2-amine (also known as
paramethoxymethamphetamine and PMMA).
l. 4,4′-Dimethylaminorex (4,4′-DMAR; 4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-2-
oxazolamine; 4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-4,5-dihydro-1,3-oxazol-2-amine).
m. Amineptine (Also known as 7- [(10,11-dihydro-5Hdibenzo[a,d]cyclohepten-5-
yl)amino]heptanoic acid).
n. Mesocarb (Also known as N-phenyl-N′ -(3-(1- phenylpropan-2-yl)-1,2,3-oxadiazol-3- ium-
5-yl)carbamimidate).
o. Methiopropamine (Also known as N-methyl-1-(thiophen-2-yl)propan-2-amine).

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 21
p. Ethylphenidate (ethyl 2-phenyl-2-(piperidin-2-yl)acetate).
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 19-03.1-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
19-03.1-09. Schedule III.
1. The controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule III.
2. Schedule III consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common
or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.
3. Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material,
compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances
having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers (whether
optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever the existence of such
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
a. Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in dosage unit form containing any
stimulant substances listed in schedule II and any other drug of the quantitative
composition shown in that schedule for those drugs or which is the same except that it
contains a lesser quantity of controlled substances.
b. Benzphetamine.
c. Chlorphentermine.
d. Clortermine.
e. Phendimetrazine.
4. Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material,
compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substances
having a depressant effect on the central nervous system:
a. Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing:
(1) Amobarbital;
(2) Secobarbital;
(3) Pentobarbital;
or any salt thereof and one or more other active medicinal ingredients which are not
listed in any schedule.
b. Any suppository dosage form containing:
(1) Amobarbital;
(2) Secobarbital;
(3) Pentobarbital;
or any salt of any of these drugs and approved by the food and drug administration for
marketing only as a suppository.
c. Any substance that contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid, or any salt of a
derivative of barbituric acid, except those substances which are specifically listed in other
schedules thereof.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 22
d. Chlorhexadol.
e. Embutramide.
f. Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid in a United States food and drug administration-approved
drug product.
g. Ketamine.
h. Lysergic acid.
i. Lysergic acid amide.
j. Methyprylon.
k. Perampanel.
l. Sativex or its successor name as determined by the federal food and drug administration.
m. Sulfondiethylmethane.
n. Sulfonethylmethane.
o. Sulfonmethane.
p. Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof. Some trade or other names for a
tiletamine-zolazepam combination product: Telazol. Some trade or other names for
tiletamine: 2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone. Some trade or other names for
zolazepam: 4-2(2-fluorophenyl)-6, 8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo-[3,4-e][1,4]-diazepin-
7(1H)-one, flupyrazapon.
5. Nalorphine.
6. Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material,
compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any of the following narcotic drugs, or their
salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below:
a. (1) Not more than 1.80 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than
90 milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline
alkaloid of opium.
(2) Not more than 1.80 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than
90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in
recognized therapeutic amounts.
(3) Not more than 1.80 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or not more than
90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in
recognized therapeutic amounts.
(4) Not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or not more than
15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in
recognized therapeutic amounts.
(5) Not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams, or not
more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.
(6) Not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams with
one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 23
b. Buprenorphine.
7. Anabolic steroids. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following
anabolic steroidssubstances, including its salts, esters, and ethers:
a. 3beta,17-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;
b. 3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;
c. 5alpha-androstan-3,17-dione;
d. 5alpha-androstan-3,6,17-trione;
e. 1-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-ene);
e.f. 1-androstenediol (3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-ene);
f.g. 4-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene);
g.h. 5-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);
h.i. 1-androstenedione ([5alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione);
i.j. 4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3,17-dione);
j.k. 5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3,17-dione);
k.l. Bolasterone (7alpha,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
l.m. Boldenone (17beta-hydroxyandrost-1,4,-diene-3-one);
m.n Boldione (androsta-1,4-diene-3,17-dione);
o. 6-bromo-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17-dione;
p. 6-bromo-androstan-3,17-dione;
n.q. Calusterone (7beta,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
r. 4-chloro-17alpha-methyl-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17beta-diol;
s. 4-chloro-17alpha-methyl-androst-4-ene-3beta,17beta-diol;
t. 4-chloro-17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one;
u. 4-chloro-17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,11-dione;
o.v. Clostebol (4-chloro-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
p.w. Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro-17beta-hydroxy-17alpha-methyl-androst-1,4-
dien-3-one);
q.x. Delta-1-dihydrotestosterone (also known as '1-testosterone') (17beta-hydroxy-5alpha-
androst-1-en-3-one);
r.y. Desoxymethyltestosterone (17a-methyl-5a-androst-2-en-17beta-ol) (also known as
madol);
s.z. 4-dihydrotestosterone (17beta-hydroxy-androstan-3-one);

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 24
aa. 3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;
bb. 3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;
cc. 2alpha,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxy-5beta-androstan-3-one;
t.dd. Drostanolone (17beta-hydroxy-2alpha-methyl-5alpha-androstan-3-one);
ee. 2alpha,3alpha-epithio-17alpha-methyl-5alpha-androstan-17beta-ol;
ff. estra-4,9,11-triene-3,17-dione;
gg. 13beta-ethyl-17beta-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;
u.hh. Ethylestrenol (17alpha-ethyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-ene);
v.ii. Fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17alpha-methyl-11beta, 17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-
one);
w.jj. Formebolone (2-formyl-17alpha-methyl-11alpha, 17beta-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-
one);
x.kk. Furazabol (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan);
ll. [3,2-c]furazan-5alpha-androstan-17beta-ol;
mm. 18a-homo-3-hydroxy-estra-2,5(10)-dien-17-one;
nn. 4-hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,17-dione;
oo. 17beta-hydroxy-androstano[2,3-d]isoxazole;
pp. 17beta-hydroxy-androstano[3,2-c]isoxazole;
qq. 3beta-hydroxy-estra-4,9,11-trien-17-one;
y.rr. 13beta-ethyl-17alpha-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;
z.ss. 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17beta-dihydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one);
aa.tt. 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17beta-dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one);
bb.uu. Mestanolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-5alpha-androstan-3-one);
cc.vv. Mesterolone (1alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-[5alpha]-androstan-3-one);
dd.ww. Methandienone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);
ee.xx. Methandriol (17alpha-methyl-3beta,17beta-dihydroxyandrost-5-ene);
ff.yy. Methasterone (2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl-5[alpha]-androstan-17[beta]-ol-3-one);
gg.zz. Methenolone (1-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-en-3-one);
aaa. 17alpha-methyl-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17beta-diol;
bbb. 17alpha-methyl-5alpha-androstan-17beta-ol;
ccc. 17alpha-methyl-androstan-3-hydroxyimine-17beta-ol;
ddd. 6alpha-methyl-androst-4-ene-3,17-dione;

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 25
eee. 17alpha-methyl-androst-2-ene-3,17beta-diol;
hh.fff. 17alpha-methyl-3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;
ii.ggg. 17alpha-methyl-3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;
jj.hhh. 17alpha-methyl-3beta,17beta-dihyroxyandrost-4-ene;
kk.iii. 17alpha-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17alpha-methyl-4-hydroxy-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-
en-3-one);
ll.jjj. Methyldienolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one);
mm.kkk. Methyltrienolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyestra-4,9(11)-trien-3-one);
nn.lll. Methyltestosterone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
oo.mmm. Mibolerone (7alpha,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
pp.nnn.17alpha-methyl-delta1-dihydrotestosterone (17bbeta-hydroxy-17alpha-methyl-5alpha-
androst-1-en-3-one) (also known as '17-alpha-methyl-1-testosterone');
qq.ooo.Nandrolone (17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
rr.ppp. 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);
ss.qqq. 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3alpha,17beta-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);
tt.rrr. 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);
uu.sss. 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3alpha,17-beta-dihydroxyester-5-ene);
vv.ttt. 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3,17-dione);
ww.uuu. 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione (estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione);
xx.vvv. 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3,17-dione);
yy.www.Norboletheone (13beta,17alpha-diethyl-17beta-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one);
zz.xxx. Norclostebol (4-chloro-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
aaa.yyy. Norethandrolone (17alpha-ethyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
bbb.zzz. Normethandrolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
ccc.aaaa. Oxandrolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-2-oxa-[5alpha]-androstan-3-one);
ddd.bbbb. Oxymesterone (17alpha-methyl-4-17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
eee.cccc. Oxymetholone (17alpha-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-17beta-hydroxy [5alpha]-
androstan-3-one);
dddd. [3,2-c]pyrazole-androst-4-en-17beta-ol;
fff.eeee.Stanozolol (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy[5alpha]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole);
ggg.ffff. Stenbolone (17beta-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one);
hhh.gggg. Prostanozol (17[beta]- hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstano[3,2-c]pyrazole);

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 26
iii.hhhh.Testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic acid lactone);
jjj.iiii. Testosterone (17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
kkk.jjjj. Tetrahydrogestrinone (13beta,17alpha-diethyl-17beta-hydroxygon-4,9,11-trien-3-one); or
lll.kkkk. Trenbolone (17beta-hydroxyestr-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
or any salt, ester, or isomer of a drug or substance described or listed in this subsection,
if that salt, ester, or isomer promotes muscle growth.
The term does not include an anabolic steroid that is expressly intended for administration
through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species and which has been approved by the
secretary of health and human services for administration unless any person prescribes,
dispenses, possesses, delivers, or distributes for human use.
8. Hallucinogenic substances.
a. Dronabinol (synthetic) [(-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol] in sesame oil and
encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a United States food and drug administration-
approved drug product.
b. Any product in hard or soft gelatin capsule form containing natural dronabinol (derived
from the cannabis plant) or synthetic dronabinol (produced from synthetic materials) in
sesame oil, for which an abbreviated new drug application has been approved by the
food and drug administration under section 505(j) of the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 355(j)] which references as its listed drug the drug product
referred to in subdivision a.
9. The board may except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant
or depressant substance listed in subsections 3 and 4 from the application of all or any part of
this chapter if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one or more active medicinal
ingredients not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if
the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that
vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a stimulant or depressant effect
on the central nervous system.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 19-03.1-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
19-03.1-11. Schedule IV.
1. The controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule IV.
2. Schedule IV consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common
or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.
3. Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material,
compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs or their salts
calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below:
a. Not more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine
sulfate per dosage unit.
b. Dextropropoxyphene (also known as alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino- 1,2-diphenyl-3-methyl-
2-propionoxybutane).
c. 2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its salts, optical and
geometric isomers and salts of these isomers including Tramadol.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 27
4. Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material,
compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the following substances,
including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
a. Alprazolam.
b. Alfaxalone.
c. Barbital.
d. Brexanolone.
e. Bromazepam.
f. Camazepam.
g. Carisoprodol.
h. Chloral betaine.
i. Chloral hydrate.
j. Chlordiazepoxide.
k. Clobazam.
l. Clonazepam.
m. Clorazepate.
n. Clotiazepam.
o. Cloxazolam.
p. Daridorexant.
q. Delorazepam.
r. Diazepam.
s. Dichloralphenazone.
t. Estazolam.
u. Ethchlorvynol.
v. Ethinamate.
w. Ethyl loflazepate.
x. Fludiazepam.
y. Flunitrazepam.
z. Flurazepam.
aa. Fospropofol.
bb. Halazepam.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 28
cc. Haloxazolam.
dd. Indiplon.
ee. Ketazolam.
ff. Lemborexant.
gg. Loprazolam.
hh. Lorazepam.
ii. Lorcaserin.
jj. Lormetazepam.
kk. Mebutamate.
ll. Medazepam.
mm. Meprobamate.
nn. Methohexital.
oo. Methylphenobarbital (also known as mephobarbital).
pp. Midazolam.
qq. Nimetazepam.
rr. Nitrazepam.
ss. Nordiazepam.
tt. Oxazepam.
uu. Oxazolam.
vv. Paraldehyde.
ww. Petrichloral.
xx. Phenobarbital.
yy. Pinazepam.
zz. Propofol.
aaa. Prazepam.
bbb. Quazepam.
ccc. Remimazolam.
ddd. Suvorexant.
eee. Temazepam.
fff. Tetrazepam.
ggg. Triazolam.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 29
hhh. Zaleplon.
iii. Zolpidem.
jjj. Zopiclone.
kkk. Zuranolone.
5. Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material,
compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances
having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts
of isomers:
a. Cathine.
b. Diethylpropion.
c. Fencamfamin.
d. Fenproporex.
e. Mazindol.
f. Mefenorex.
g. Modafinil.
h. Pemoline (including organometallic complexes and chelates thereof).
i. Phentermine.
j. Pipradrol.
k. Serdexmethylphenidate.
l. Sibutramine.
m. Solriamfetol.
n. SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenylethane).
6. Other substances. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of:
a. Pentazocine, including its salts.
b. Butorphanol, including its optical isomers.
c. Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-oxopropyl]
[(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1H-imidazol-2-yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic acid)
(including its optical isomers) and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.
7. Hallucinogenic substances. Pharmaceutical composition of crystalline polymorph psilocybin,
known as COMP360 or any such trade name approved for COMP360 by the United States
food and drug administration.
8. The board may except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any
depressant substance listed in subsection 2 from the application of all or any part of this
chapter if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one or more active medicinal
ingredients not having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the
admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 30
vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a depressant effect on the central
nervous system.
SECTION 4. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2064 - PAGE 31
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2064 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 6
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State